District of Columbia statutes.
3-330

“Stadium” defined.

As used in this subchapter the term “Stadium” includes all equipment, appliances, facilities, and property of any kind (including any area designated A, B, C, D, or E on the revised map entitled “Map to Designate Transfer of Stadium and Lease of Parking Lots to the District,” prepared jointly by the National Park Service (National Capital Region) and the District of Columbia Department of Public Works for site development and dated October 1986 (NPS drawing number 831/87284-A)), necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Sept. 7, 1957, 71 Stat. 622, Pub. L. 85-300, § 11
July 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 423, Pub. L. 85-561, § 1(16)
Sept. 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 702, Pub. L. 86-378, § 1(9)
Oct. 29, 1986, 100 Stat. 3313, Pub. L. 99-581, § 2
1981 Ed., § 2-330.
1973 Ed., § 2-1729.
See note to § 3-321.

Effect of dissolution of Sports Commission: See note to § 3-321.

Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-321.